District of Columbia statutes.
47-2106

Penalty for conducting false “closing-out sales” and for violation of this chapter; prosecutions.

(a)

Any person who shall advertise, hold, conduct, or carry on any sale of goods, wares, or merchandise under the description of closing-out sale or a sale of goods, wares, or merchandise damaged by fire, smoke, water, or otherwise, contrary to the provision of this chapter, or who shall violate any of the provisions of this chapter shall be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor and shall, upon conviction thereof, be fined not more than the amount set forth in [§ 22-3571.01] or imprisonment for 90 days or both.

(b)

Prosecutions for violations of this chapter and regulations promulgated under the authority of this chapter shall be conducted in the name of the District of Columbia by the Attorney General for the District of Columbia or any of his assistants.

(c)

Civil fines, penalties, and fees may be imposed as alternative sanctions for any infraction of the provisions of this chapter, or any rules or regulations issued under the authority of this chapter, pursuant to Chapter 18 of Title 2. Adjudication of any infraction of this chapter shall be pursuant to Chapter 18 of Title 2.

History

Sept. 1, 1959, 73 Stat. 450, Pub. L. 86-219, § 6
Oct. 5, 1985, D.C. Law 6-42, § 436, 32 DCR 4450
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
Apr. 13, 2005, D.C. Law 15-354, § 73(g), 52 DCR 2638
June 11, 2013, D.C. Law 19-317, § 286(k), 60 DCR 2064

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-2106.
1973 Ed., § 47-3006.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 15-354 substituted “Attorney General for the District of Columbia” for “Corporation Counsel”.
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-317 substituted “not more than the amount set forth in [§ 22-3571.01]” for “not more than $300” in (a).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 286(k) of the Criminal Fine Proportionality Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-45, April 1, 2013, 60 DCR 5400, 20 DCSTAT 1300).

Editor's Notes

Applicability of D.C. Law 19-317: Section 401 of D.C. Law 19-317 provided that the act shall apply only to offenses committed on or after June 11, 2013.